Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.045

Offenders under supervision of the department—Possession prohibited—Penalties.

As a sentence condition and requirement, offenders under the supervision of the department of corrections pursuant to chapter 9.94A RCW shall not own, use, or possess firearms or ammunition. In addition to any penalty imposed pursuant to RCW 9.41.040 when applicable, offenders found to be in actual or constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the appropriate violation process and sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.633, 9.94A.716, or 9.94A.737. Firearms or ammunition owned, used, or possessed by offenders may be confiscated by community corrections officers and turned over to the Washington state patrol for disposal as provided in RCW 9.41.098.

[ 2009 c 28 s 2; 1991 c 221 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.